dictionaries/gl_ES/src/gl_ES.dic
acóbrir/666,617
advertir/600,620
advirtir/666,621,623
advírtir/666,622,624
aferir/600,620
afirir/666,621,623
afírir/666,622,624
agredir/600,620
agridir/666,621,623
agrídir/666,622,624
chóspir/666,617,717
cóbrir/666,617,717,817
comedir/600,620,800,820
comidir/666,621,623,821,823
comídir/666,622,624,822,824
conferir/600,620
confirir/666,621,623
confírir/666,622,624
conseguir/600,620,621
conséguir/666,622
consentir/600,620,621,700,720,721
conséntir/666,622,722
consiguir/666,623
consíguir/666,624
consintir/666,623,723
consíntir/666,624,724
consómir/666,617,817
conxónguir/666,617
conxónguir/666,617,817
cóspir/666,617,717
deferir/600,620,700,720
defirir/666,621,623,721,723
defírir/666,622,624,722,724
desapedir/600,620
desapedir/600,620,700,720
desapidir/666,621,623
desapidir/666,621,623,721,723
desapídir/666,622,624
desapídir/666,622,624,722,724
descóbrir/666,617,817
deslócir/666,617
desmentir/600,620,621
desméntir/666,622
desmintir/666,623
desmíntir/666,624
desórdir/666,617
despedir/600,620,800,820
despidir/666,621,623,821,823
despídir/666,622,624,822,824
despir/600,620,800,820
despólir/666,617
desvestir/600,620,800,820
desvistir/666,621,623,821,823
desvístir/666,622,624,822,824
desxónguir/666,617
diferir/600,620,700,720
difirir/666,621,623,721,723
difírir/666,622,624,722,724
discernir/600,620
discirnir/666,621,623
discírnir/666,622,624
dispir/666,621,623,821,823
díspir/666,622,624,822,824
divertir/600,620,800,820
divirtir/666,621,623,821,823
divírtir/666,622,624,822,824
dixerir/600,620
dixirir/666,621,623
dixírir/666,622,624
dórmir/666,617,717
encóbrir/666,617
engólir/666,617
enxerir/600,620
enxirir/666,621,623
enxírir/666,622,624
escódir/666,617
espelir/600,620,700,720,800,820
espilir/666,621,623,721,723,821,823
espílir/666,622,624,722,724,822,824
espir/600,620,800,820
expedir/600,620
expidir/666,621,623
expídir/666,622,624
ferir/600,620,621,800,820,821
férir/666,622,822
firir/666,623,823
fírir/666,624,824
for/666,631,632,731,732,831,832
impedir/600,620
impidir/666,621,623
impídir/666,622,624
inferir/600,620
infirir/666,621,623
infírir/666,622,624
inserir/600,620,800,820
insirir/666,621,623,821,823
insírir/666,622,624,822,824
interferir/600,620,700,720,800,820
interfirir/666,621,623,721,723,821,823
interfírir/666,622,624,722,724,822,824
investir/600,620
investir/600,620,700,720
invistir/666,621,623
invistir/666,621,623,721,723
invístir/666,622,624
invístir/666,622,624,722,724
inxerir/600,620
inxerir/600,620,800,820
inxirir/666,621,623
inxirir/666,621,623,821,823
inxírir/666,622,624
inxírir/666,622,624,822,824
ir/630,631,730,731,830,831
ír/630,730,830
ispir/666,621,623,821,823
íspir/666,622,624,822,824
lócir/666,617,717,817
malferir/600,620,621
malférir/666,622
malfirir/666,623
malfírir/666,624
medir/600,620,700,720,800,820
midir/666,621,623,721,723,821,823
mídir/666,622,624,722,724,822,824
mólir/666,617
mónguir/666,617
móxir/666,617
móxir/666,617,717
ólir/666,617,717
órdir/666,617
órdir/666,617,717
pedir/600,620
pedir/600,620,700,720
perseguir/600,620,621
perséguir/666,622
persiguir/666,623
persíguir/666,624
pidir/666,621,623
pidir/666,621,623,721,723
pídir/666,622,624
pídir/666,622,624,722,724
pólir/666,617
preferir/600,620
prefirir/666,621,623
prefírir/666,622,624
presentir/600,620,621
preséntir/666,622
presintir/666,623
presíntir/666,624
preterir/600,620
pretirir/666,621,623
proferir/600,620
profirir/666,621,623
profírir/666,622,624
recóbrir/666,617
redescóbrir/666,617
reexpedir/600,620
reexpidir/666,621,623
reexpídir/666,622,624
reflectir/600,620,800,820
reflictir/666,621,623,821,823
reflíctir/666,622,624,822,824
reinvestir/600,620
reinvistir/666,621,623
reinvístir/666,622,624
revestir/600,620,800,820
revistir/666,621,623,821,823
revístir/666,622,624,822,824
sacódir/666,617,817
seguir/600,620,621,700,720,721,800,820,821
séguir/666,622,722,822
servir/600,620,621,700,720,721,800,820,821
sérvir/666,622,722,822
siguir/666,623,723,823
síguir/666,624,724,824
sirvir/666,623,723,823
sírvir/666,624,724,824
sóbir/666,617,717
sóbir/666,617,717,817
sófrir/666,617,717
sómir/666,617,817
suxerir/600,620
suxirir/666,621,623
suxírir/666,622,624
transgredir/600,620
transgridir/666,621,623
transgrídir/666,622,624
translócir/666,617
vair/666,633,733,833
vestir/600,620,700,720,800,820
vistir/666,621,623,721,723,821,823
vístir/666,622,624,722,724,822,824
xónguir/666,617
xónguir/666,617,817
